/* Creates a table for information about muscles */
CREATE TABLE muscles (
	MuscleID INT IDENTITY(1,1) PRIMARY KEY,
	MuscleName VARCHAR(255),
	MuscleGroup VARCHAR(255),
	PrimaryFunction VARCHAR(255)
);

/* Adds a Location column */
ALTER TABLE muscles
ADD Location VARCHAR(255);

/* Inserts values into the table */
INSERT INTO muscles
VALUES	('Trapezius', 'Upper Back, Neck, and Shoulder', 'Elevates, depresses, retracts, and rotates the scapula.', 'Back and Shoulder'),
		('Sternocleidomastoid', 'Neck', 'Flexes the neck or helps bend the head forward or to the side.', 'Neck'),
		('Pectoralis Major', 'Chest', 'Rotates the arm and draws the arm forward and down.', 'Chest'),
		('Latissimus Dorsi', 'Back, and Shoulder', 'Draws the shoulder downward and backward.', 'Back'),
		('Serratus Anterior', 'Thorax', 'Assists in the upward rotation of the scapula.', 'Movement'),
		('Rectus Abdominis', 'Abdominal', 'Flexes the vertebral column, bringing the rib cage closer to the pelvis.', 'Abdomen'),
		('External Oblique', 'Abdominal', 'Compresses abdominal contents, aiding in forced expiration, defecation, urination, and childbirth.', 'Abdomen'),
		('Pectineus', 'Hip Adductor', 'Assists in medial rotation of the thigh.', 'Hip'),
		('Tenor Fasciae Latae', 'Hip', 'Stabilizes the pelvis on the leg when standing on one leg.', 'Hip'),
		('Adductor Longus', 'Hip Adductor', 'Adducts the thigh, bringing it toward the midline of the body.', 'Inner Thigh'),
		('Sartorius', 'Hip', 'Flexes, abducts, and laterally rotates the thigh at the hip joint and flexes the knee.', 'Hip and Thigh'),
		('Gracilis', 'Hip Adductor', 'Assists in knee flexion and medial rotation of the leg when the knee is flexed.', 'Inner Thigh'),
		('Rectus Femoris', 'Quadricep', 'Extends the knee and flexes the hip.', 'Front of Thight'),
		('Vastus Intermedius', 'Quadricep', 'Extends the knee.', 'Front of Thigh'),
		('Vastus Lateralis', 'Quadricep', 'Extends the knee.', 'Front of Thigh (Lateral)'),
		('Vastus Medialis', 'Quadricep', 'Extends the knee.', 'Front of Thigh (Medial)'),
		('Peroneus Longus', 'Lateral Compartment', 'Helps stabilize and support the lateral side of the arch of the foot.', 'Lower Leg and Foot'),
		('Gastrocnemius', 'Calf', 'Plantarflexes the foot at the ankle (helps in pushing off during walking and running) and flexes the leg at the knee joint.', 'Back of Lower Leg'),
		('Tibialis Anterior', 'Anterior Compartment', 'Dorsiflexes and inverts the foot at the ankle.', 'Front of Lower Leg'),
		('Extensor Digitorum', 'Anterior Compartment', 'Extends the toes and dorsiflexes the foot.', 'Front of Lower Leg'),
		('Soleus', 'Calf', 'Plantarflexes the foot at the ankle, important for standing and walking.', 'Back of Lower Leg'),
		('Biceps Brachii', 'Arm', 'Flexes the elbow, assists with shoulder flexion, and supinates the forearm.', 'Upper Arm'),
		('Brachialis', 'Arm', 'Primary flexor of the elbow, working to flex the elbow regardless of the position of the forearm.', 'Upper Arm'),
		('Pronator Teres', 'Forearm', 'Pronates the forearm and assists with elbow flexion.', 'Forearm'),
		('Brachioradialis', 'Forearm', 'Flexes the elbow, particularly when the forearm is in mid-pronation.','Forearm'),
		('Extensor Carpi Radialis Longus', 'Forearm', 'Extends and abducts the wrist.', 'Forearm'),
		('Extensor Carpi Radialis Brevis', 'Forearm', 'Extends and abducts the wrist.', 'Forearm'),
		('Levator Scapulae', 'Neck and Shoulder', 'Rotates the scapula downward when the neck is fixed and flexes the neck to the same side if the scapulae are stable.', 'Neck and Upper Back'),
		('Rhomboid Minor', 'Upper Back', 'Retracts and elevates the scapula and rotates the scapula downward.', 'Upper Back'),
		('Rhomboid Major', 'Upper Back', 'Retracts and elevates the scapula and rotates the scapula downward.', 'Upper Back'),
		('Serratus Posterior Superior', 'Respiratory Muscles', 'Elevates the upper ribs, aiding in inspiration.', 'Upper Back'),
		('Serratus Posterior Inferior', 'Respiratory Muscles', 'Depresses the lower ribs, aiding in forced expiration.', 'Lower Back'),
		('Splenius Capitis', 'Deep Cervical', 'Extends the head and neck and rotates the head to the same side.', 'Neck and Upper Back'),
		('Splenius Cervicis', 'Deep Cervical', 'Extends and rotates the cervical spine to the same side and laterally flexes the neck to the same side.', 'Neck'),
		('Spinalis', 'Erector Spinae', 'Extends and laterally flexes the vertebral column.', 'Back'),
		('Longissimus', 'Erector Spinae', 'Extends, laterally flexes, and rotates the spine.', 'Back and Neck'),
		('Iliocostalis', 'Erector Spinae', 'Assists in bending the spine to the side and maintaining an upright posture.', 'Back'),
		('Semispinalis', 'Transversospinales', 'Extends and rotates the vertebral column and head to the opposite side.', 'Back and Neck'),
		('Multifidus', 'Transversospinales', 'Stabilizes vertebrae during spinal movements and extends and rotates the spine.', 'Back (Spine)'),
		('Coracobrachialis', 'Arm', 'Flexes and adducts the arm at the shoulder joint.', 'Upper Arm'),
		('Triceps Brachii', 'Arm', 'Extends the elbow, straightening the arm and the long head also assists in adducting the arm', 'Upper Arm'),
		('Flexor Carpi Ulnaris', 'Forearm', 'Flexes and adducts the wrist.', 'Forearm'),
		('Palmaris Longus', 'Forearm', 'Tenses the palmar aponeurosis, contributing to grip strength.', 'Forearm'),
		('Flexor Digitorum Superficialis', 'Forearm', 'Flexes the proximal interphalangeal joints and the metacarpophalangeal joints of the middle four fingers.', 'Forearm'),
		('Flexor Digitorum Profundus', 'Forearm', 'Flexes the distal interphalangeal joints of the fingers.', 'Forearm'),
		('Flexor Pollicis Longus', 'Forearm', 'Flexes the thumb at the interphalangeal and metacarpophalangeal joints.', 'Forearm'),
		('Pronator Quadratus', 'Forearm', 'Pronates the forearm.', 'Forearm'),
		('Extensor Digitorum Communis', 'Forearm', 'Extends the fingers and the wrist.', 'Forearm (Posterior)'),
		('Extensor Digiti Minimi', 'Forearm', 'Extends the little finger at all joints.', 'Forearm (Posterior)'),
		('Extensor Capri Ulnaris', 'Forearm', 'Extends and adducts the wrist', 'Forearm (Posterior)'),
		('Anconeus', 'Elbow', 'Assists in elbow extension and stabilizes the elbow joint.', 'Elbow (Posterior)'),
		('Supinator', 'Forearem', 'Supinates the forearm, which rotates the forearm so that the palm faces upward.', 'Forearm (Posterior)'),
		('Abductor Pollicis Longus', 'Forearm', 'Extends the thumb at the carpometacarpal joint.', 'Forearm (Posterior)'),
		('Extensor Pollicis Brevis', 'Forearm', 'Extends the thumb at the metacarpophalangeal joint.', 'Forearm (Posterior)'),
		('Extensor Pollicis Longus', 'Forearm', 'Extends the thumb at the interphalangeal joint and metacarpophalangeal joint.', 'Forearm (Posterior)'),
		('Extensor Indicis Proprius', 'Forearm', 'Extends the index finger at all joints.', 'Forearm (Posterior)'),
		('Flexor Carpi Radialis', 'Forearm', 'Flexes and abducts the wrist.', 'Forearm (Posterior)'),
		('Pectoralis Minor', 'Chest', 'Stabilizes the scapula by drawing it downward and forward toward the thoracic wall.', 'Chest'),
		('Subclavius', 'Chest', 'Depresses and stabilizes the clavicle.', 'Chest'),
		('Inercostal', 'Chest', 'Assist in the mechanics of breathing by moving the rib cage.', 'Chest'),
		('Gluteus Maximus', 'Gluteal', 'Important in the rise from a sitting position, climbing stairs, and staying erect.', 'Butt'),
		('Gluteus Medius', 'Gluteal', 'Stabilizes the pelvis during walking and running.', 'Butt'),
		('Gluteus Minimus', 'Gluteal', 'Medially rotates the thigh.', 'Butt'),
		('Popliteus', 'Knee', 'Unlocks the knee by rotating the femur on the tibia during the transition from knee extension to flexion when the foot is on the ground.', 'Back of Knee'),
		('Flexor Digitorum Longus', 'Lower Leg', 'Flexes the toes (digits 2 through 5) and supports the longitudinal arches of the foot.', 'Lower Leg'),
		('Flexor Hallucis Longus', 'Lower Leg', 'Flexes the big toe, crucial for the push-off phase during walking, running, and jumping.', 'Lower Leg'),
		('Tibialis Posterior', 'Lower Leg', 'Supports the arches of the foot, essential for maintaining stability and proper foot alignment.', 'Lower Leg'),
		('Biceps Femoris', 'Hamstring', 'Extends the hip, flexes the knee, and laterally rotates the knee when it is flexed.', 'Back of Thigh'),
		('Semitendinosus', 'Hamstring', 'Extends the hip, flexes the knee, and medially rotates the knee when it is flexed.', 'Back of Thigh'),
		('Semimembranosus', 'Hamstring', 'Extends the hip, flexes the knee, and medially rotates the knee when it is flexed.', 'Back of Thigh'),
		('Adductor Magnus', 'Hip Adductor', 'Adducts and extends the thigh and assists with medial rotation of the thigh.', 'Inner Thigh'),
		('Adductor Brevis', 'Hip Adductor', 'Adducts the thigh and assists with medial rotation of the thigh.', 'Inner Thigh'),
		('Extensor Hallucis Longus', 'Anterior Compartment', 'Extends the big toe and assists in dorsiflexion of the ankle.', 'Lower Leg'),
		('Fibularis (Peroneus) Tertius', 'Anterior Compartment', 'Everts and dorsiflexes the foot.', 'Lower Leg'),
		('Peroneus Brevis', 'Lateral Compartment', 'Everts and plantarflexes the foot.', 'Lower Leg'),
		('Plantaris', 'Calf', 'Assists with knee flexion and plantarflexion of the foot.', 'Lower Leg'),
		('Deltoideus (Anterior)', 'Shoulder', 'Flexes and medially rotates the arm at the shoulder.', 'Shoulder'),
		('Deltoideus (Lateral)', 'Shoulder', 'Abducts the arm at the shoulder.', 'Shoulder'),
		('Deltoideus (Posterior)', 'Shoulder', 'Extends and laterally rotates the arm at the shoulder.', 'Shoulder'),
		('Psoas Major', 'Iliopsoas', 'Laterally rotates the hip and stabilizes the lumbar region of the spine.', 'Hip and Lower Spine'),
		('Ilicus', 'Iliopsoas', 'Flexes the hip joint and stabilizes the lumbar region of the spine.', 'Hip and Lower Spine');

/* Changes the name from Location to BodyPart */
EXEC sp_rename 'muscles.Location', 'BodyPart', 'COLUMN';

/* Selects all from the muscles table */
SELECT * FROM muscles;


/* Creates a table for information about exercises */
CREATE TABLE exercises (
	ExerciseID INT IDENTITY(1,1) PRIMARY KEY,
	MuscleID INT NOT NULL,
	ExerciseName VARCHAR(255),
	Description VARCHAR(MAX),
	Technique VARCHAR(MAX),
	FOREIGN KEY (MuscleID) REFERENCES muscles(MuscleID)
);

/* Inserts values into the table */
INSERT INTO exercises
VALUES	(1, 'Dumbbell Shrugs', 'This exercise primarily targets the upper fibers of the trapezius muscle, which are responsible for elevating the scapula.',
			'Stand with feet shoulder-width apart, holding a dumbbell in each hand with arms hanging by your sides. Elevate your shoulders towards your ears in a shrugging motion, hold for a brief moment, and then lower them back down. Repeat for the desired number of repetitions.'),
		(1, 'Face Pulls', 'This exercise targets the middle and lower fibers of the trapezius, which are involved in retracting and rotating the scapula.',
			'Attach a rope to a high pulley of a cable machine. Pull the rope towards your face while you externally rotate your hands (palms facing out by the end of the movement). Your hands should come beside or just behind your ears. Focus on squeezing your shoulder blades together at the end of the movement before slowly returning to the starting position. Repeat for the desired number of repetitions.'),
		(1, 'Barbell Rows', 'A compound exercise that targets the middle and lower trapezius along with other back muscles.',
			'Bend your knees slightly and bend over the bar with your back straight. Grab the barbell with a grip wider than shoulder width. Pull the bar towards your lower ribcage while keeping the elbows close to the body. Squeeze your shoulder blades together at the top, then slowly lower the bar back to the starting position. Repeat for the desired number of repetitions.'),
		(2, 'Neck Flexion and Extension', 'This exercise helps to strengthen and improve the flexibility of the neck muscles, including the sternocleidomastoid.',
			'Sit or stand with a straight posture. Slowly tilt your head forward, trying to touch your chin to your chest, and then gently tilt your head backward looking up at the ceiling. Keep each movement slow and controlled. Perform 10-15 repetitions.'),
		(2, 'Lateral Neck Flexion', 'Targets the sternocleidomastoid for improving neck lateral flexibility and strength.',
			'Maintain a straight posture while sitting or standing. Tilt your head to bring your ear toward the shoulder without lifting the shoulder. Hold for a few seconds, then return to the starting position and repeat on the other side. Perform 10-15 repetitions on each side.'),
		(3, 'Bench Press', 'This compound exercise targets the pectoralis major, along with the triceps and deltoids, to increase upper body strength.',
			'Lie back on a flat bench with a barbell positioned above your chest. Grip the barbell slightly wider than shoulder-width. Unrack the barbell by straightening your arms. Lower the bar slowly until it touches your mid-chest. Push the bar back to the starting '),
		(3, 'Push-Ups', 'Push-ups are a versatile bodyweight exercise that strengthens the chest, shoulders, and triceps.',
			'Start in a plank position with your hands slightly wider than your shoulders. Lower your body until your chest nearly touches the floor. Keep your elbows close to your body to maximize pectoral activation. Push back up to the start position and repeat. Perform sets of 10-20 repetitions based on your fitness level.'),
		(3, 'Chest Fly', 'Focuses on stretching and contracting the pectoralis major to improve muscle tone and width.',
			'Lie on a flat bench with a dumbbell in each hand, palms facing each other. With a slight bend in your elbows, lower the weights out to the sides of your shoulders. Keep the movement controlled without letting your arms drop too far down. Bring the dumbbells back together at the top, squeezing your chest muscles. Perform 10-12 repetitions.'),
		(4, 'Pull-Ups', 'Pull-ups are a fundamental upper body exercise that targets the latissimus dorsi, enhancing back strength and endurance.',
			'Grip an overhead bar with a wide overhand grip. Hang fully extended, pull yourself up until your chin is above the bar, and then lower yourself back to the starting position. Keep your movements smooth and controlled. Perform as many repetitions as you can.'),
		(4, 'Lat Pull Downs', 'Lat pulldowns focus primarily on developing the latissimus dorsi, contributing to wider, thicker back muscles.',
			' Sit at a lat pulldown station and secure your thighs under the pads. Grasp the bar with a wide grip, pull the bar down towards your chest, and then slowly let it rise back up after a slight pause. Keep your back straight and avoid leaning back too far. Perform 8-12 repetitions.'),
		(4, 'Single-Arm Dumbbell Row', 'This exercise targets the latissimus dorsi, improving unilateral strength and muscle balance.',
			'Place one knee on a bench, the other foot on the floor, lean forward slightly, and support your body with your free hand. With a dumbbell in the other hand, pull the dumbbell upward to the side of your torso, keeping your torso stationary. Lower it back down and repeat for 8-12 repetitions before switching sides.'),
		(5, 'Push-Ups Plus', 'This exercise enhances scapular protraction and is excellent for targeting the serratus anterior specifically.',
			'Begin in a standard push-up position with your hands slightly wider than shoulder-width. Perform a regular push-up, and at the top of the movement, push further, rounding your upper back and elevating your shoulders as high as possible. This "plus" motion emphasizes serratus anterior activation. Lower back down and repeat. Perform 8-15 repetitions.'),
		(5, 'Scapular Wall Slides', 'Scapular wall slides are effective for improving the mobility and strength of the serratus anterior.',
			'Stand with your back against a wall, feet about shoulder-width apart. Place your arms against the wall with elbows at a 90-degree angle. Slide your arms upwards, keeping your wrists, elbows, and shoulders in contact with the wall, and then slide them back down. Ensure your back remains flat against the wall throughout the movement. Perform 10-15 repetitions.'),
		(6, 'Crunches', 'Crunches specifically target the rectus abdominis muscle, helping to improve core strength and tone the abdominal area.',
			'Lie on your back with your knees bent and feet flat on the floor. Place your hands behind your head without locking your fingers. Curl your upper body towards your knees, lifting your shoulder blades off the ground. Keep your lower back pressed to the floor, and hold the contraction at the top for a moment before slowly lowering back down. Perform 10-20 repetitions.'),
		(6, 'Bicycle Crunches', 'This exercise engages the rectus abdominis and the obliques, enhancing overall core strength and abdominal muscle definition.',
			'Lie flat on the floor with your lower back pressed to the ground. Place your hands behind your head. Bring your knees up to form a 90-degree angle. Perform a bicycle pedal motion: touch your right elbow to your left knee, then your left elbow to your right knee. Continue alternating sides in a "pedaling" motion. Perform 12-15 repetitions on each side.'),
		(6, 'Hanging Leg Raises', 'Hanging leg raises are highly effective in targeting the lower part of the rectus abdominis and increasing overall abdominal strength.',
			'Hang from a pull-up bar with your legs straight down. Raise your legs in front of you while keeping them straight until they are parallel with the ground. Slowly lower them back down without swinging. Perform 8-12 repetitions.'),
		(7, 'Russian Twists', 'This exercise targets the oblique muscles and enhances rotational strength and stability of the core.',
			'Sit on the floor with your knees bent and feet flat. Lean back slightly to create a V-shape with your torso and thighs. Hold a medicine ball or weight with both hands in front of your chest. Twist your torso to the right, touching the ball or weight to the ground beside you. Rotate to the left side, repeating the movement. Continue alternating sides for 10-15 repetitions each.'),
		(7, 'Side Planks', 'Side planks focus on the lateral stability of the core, particularly targeting the oblique muscles.',
			'Lie on your side with your legs extended. Prop your body up on your elbow, which should be directly beneath your shoulder. Lift your hips off the ground, forming a straight line from your ankles to your shoulders. Hold this position for 20-30 seconds while keeping your hips elevated. Repeat on the other side.'),
		(7, 'Wood Choppers', 'Wood choppers are great for integrating movement and strength across the core, focusing on the obliques for rotational power.',
			'Stand with your feet shoulder-width apart. Hold a medicine ball, dumbbell, or cable handle with both hands. Start with the weight next to your left hip. Rotate your torso and lift the weight diagonally across your body until it is above your right shoulder. Reverse the motion to return to the starting position. Complete 10-12 repetitions on one side before switching to the other.'),
		(8, 'Seated Hip Adduction', 'This exercise uses a machine to target the adductor muscles of the hip, including the pectineus.',
			'Sit on an adduction machine with your legs apart. Place your feet behind the foot pads and your knees against the knee pads. Slowly bring your legs together against the resistance of the machine. Hold briefly at the top of the movement before returning to the starting position. Perform 8-12 repetitions.'),
		(8, 'Cable Hip Adduction', 'This exercise focuses on the adduction movement of the thigh, strengthening the pectineus and other adductor muscles.',
			'Attach an ankle cuff to a low cable pulley and then to your ankle. Stand with the side you are working towards the machine, keeping your body straight. Move your attached leg across the front of your body, pulling against the cable. Return slowly to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions and repeat on the other leg.'),
		(9, 'Cable Hip Adduction', 'Focuses on the adductor muscles by pulling the leg toward the midline against resistance.',
			'Attach an ankle cuff to a low cable pulley and then to your ankle. Stand with the side you are working towards the machine, keeping your body straight. Move your attached leg across the front of your body, pulling against the cable. Return slowly to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions and repeat on the other leg.'),
		(10, 'Adductor Machine', 'Utilizes an adductor machine to isolate and strengthen the inner thigh muscles.',
			'Sit in the adductor machine with your legs apart. Adjust the pads so they are comfortably positioned against your knees. Slowly bring your legs together, squeezing against the resistance. Hold briefly at the point of maximum contraction, then slowly return to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions.'),
		(10, 'Standing Cable Hip Adduction', 'This exercise focuses on the adduction movement of the thigh, strengthening the pectineus and other adductor muscles.',
			'Attach an ankle cuff to a low cable pulley and then to your ankle. Stand with the side you are working towards the machine, keeping your body straight. Move your attached leg across the front of your body, pulling against the cable. Return slowly to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions and repeat on the other leg.'),
		(11, 'Seated Leg Raises', 'This exercies focuseson the hipt and knee joint movements that involve the Sartorius',
			'Sit on the edge of a chair with your legs hanging freely. Lift one leg with the knee slightly bent and rotate it outward as you raise it. This mimics the movement of crossing your legs. Lower it back down and repeat for 10-15 repetitions before switching to the other leg.'),
		(11, 'Lying Leg Raises and Rotation', 'Targets the flexion and rotation functions of the Sartorius along with other hip flexors.',
			'Lie on your back with your arms at your sides and legs extended. Lift one leg toward the ceiling while keeping it straight. As you lift, rotate the leg outward so that your toes point to the side. Lower back down in a controlled manner and repeat for 10-15 repetitions. Switch legs after completing the set.'),
		(12, 'Cable Hip Adduction', 'This exercise isolates and targets the adductor muscles of the inner thigh, including the gracilis.',
			'Attach an ankle cuff to a low cable pulley and then to your ankle. Stand with the side you are working towards the machine, keeping your body straight. Move your attached leg across the front of your body, pulling against the cable. Return slowly to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions and repeat on the other leg.'),
		(12, 'Sumo Squats', 'Sumo squats target the inner thigh muscles, particularly the gracilis, along with the gluteus and quadriceps.',
			'Stand with your feet wider than shoulder-width apart, toes pointing outwards. Hold a dumbbell with both hands in front of you or a barbell across your shoulders. Bend your knees and lower your body into a squat, keeping your back straight and chest up. Press through your heels to return to the starting position. Perform 10-12 repetitions.'),
		(13, 'Leg Extensions', 'This exercise isolates the quadriceps, particularly the rectus femoris, making it ideal for strengthening and toning the front of the thigh.',
			'Sit on a leg extension machine with your legs under the pad, feet pointed forward, and hands holding the side bars. Ensure your knees are at a 90-degree angle. Slowly lift the weight by extending your knees until your legs are almost straight. Pause at the top, then slowly lower the weight back to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions.'),
		(13, 'Squats', 'Squats engage multiple muscle groups including the rectus femoris. They are excellent for building strength and flexibility in the lower body.',
			'Stand with your feet shoulder-width apart, toes slightly turned out. Hold a barbell across your upper back or just use your body weight. Bend your knees and lower your body as though sitting back into a chair, keeping your back straight and knees over your toes. Lower down until your thighs are at least parallel to the floor. Press through your heels to return to the starting position. Perform 8-12 repetitions.'),
		(13, 'Walking Lunges', 'Walking lunges are dynamic and involve both hip flexion and knee extension, which actively engages the rectus femoris.',
			'Stand with your feet together and take a large step forward with one leg. Lower your hips to drop your back knee toward the ground, keeping your front knee directly over the ankle and back knee just under the hip. Push through the front heel to step your back foot forward, coming into a lunge with the opposite leg. Continue moving forward with each lunge. Perform 10-15 lunges on each leg.'),
		(14, 'Leg Press', 'The leg press is a powerful exercise targeting the quadriceps, including the vastus intermedius, while also engaging the glutes and hamstrings.',
			'Sit on a leg press machine with your back and head resting comfortably against the padded support. Place your feet shoulder-width apart on the footplate. Push the plate away by extending your knees and hips. Don’t lock your knees at the top of the movement. Return to the starting position by slowly bending your knees, keeping them aligned with your feet. Perform 8-12 repetitions.'),
		(14, 'Squats', 'Squats are a compound exercise that targets the entire lower body, including the vastus intermedius, by promoting functional mobility and strength.',
			'Stand with your feet shoulder-width apart, toes slightly turned out. Hold a barbell across your upper back or just use your body weight. Bend your knees and lower your body as though sitting back into a chair, keeping your back straight and knees over your toes. Lower down until your thighs are at least parallel to the floor. Press through your heels to return to the starting position. Perform 8-12 repetitions.'),
		(14, 'Knee Extensions', 'This isolation exercise specifically targets the quadriceps, making it perfect for strengthening the vastus intermedius.',
			'Sit on a knee extension machine with your back against the pad. Place the front of your lower legs under the padded lever. Adjust the pad so it falls on the lower leg, just above your feet. Slowly extend your legs to the maximum as you exhale. Hold the contraction at the top for a second, then lower the weight back to the original position, ensuring that the muscles stay under tension throughout the motion. Perform 10-15 repetitions.'),
		(15, 'Leg Extensions', 'Leg extensions are an isolation exercise that effectively targets the quadriceps, particularly focusing on knee extension which engages the vastus lateralis prominently.',
			'Sit on a leg extension machine with your legs under the pad, feet pointed forward, and hands holding the side bars. Ensure your knees are at a 90-degree angle. Slowly lift the weight by extending your knees until your legs are almost straight. Pause at the top, then slowly lower the weight back to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions.'),
		(15, 'Barbell Squats', 'Squats are a compound exercise that targets the entire lower body, including the vastus lateralis, promoting overall leg strength and stability.',
			'Stand with your feet slightly wider than shoulder-width apart, toes slightly pointing outward. Place a barbell across your upper back and hold it firmly. Keeping your back straight and chest up, bend your knees and lower your body as though you are sitting back into a chair. Keep your knees aligned with your toes and do not let them move past your toes. Lower down until your thighs are at least parallel to the floor. Push through your heels to rise back to the starting position. Perform 8-12 repetitions.'),
		(15, 'Walking Lunges', 'Walking lunges are a dynamic exercise that involves multiple muscle groups in the legs, with a particular emphasis on the quadriceps including the vastus lateralis.',
			'Stand with your feet together and take a large step forward with one leg. Lower your hips to drop your back knee toward the ground, keeping your front knee directly over the ankle and back knee just under the hip. Push through the front heel to step your back foot forward, coming into a lunge with the opposite leg. Continue moving forward with each lunge. Perform 10-15 lunges on each leg.'),
		(16, 'Leg Press', 'The leg press can target the vastus medialis effectively, particularly when the feet are positioned lower on the platform.',
			'Sit on a leg press machine with your back and head resting comfortably against the padded support. Place your feet shoulder-width apart on the footplate. Push the plate away by extending your knees and hips. Don’t lock your knees at the top of the movement. Return to the starting position by slowly bending your knees, keeping them aligned with your feet. Perform 8-12 repetitions.'),
		(16, 'Knee Extensions', 'Terminal Knee Extensions are particularly effective for isolating and strengthening the vastus medialis, especially the VMO (Vastus Medialis Oblique), which is crucial for knee stability.',
			'Sit on a knee extension machine with your back against the pad. Place the front of your lower legs under the padded lever. Adjust the pad so it falls on the lower leg, just above your feet. Slowly extend your legs to the maximum as you exhale. Hold the contraction at the top for a second, then lower the weight back to the original position, ensuring that the muscles stay under tension throughout the motion. Perform 10-15 repetitions.'),
		(16, 'Step-Ups', 'The leg press can target the vastus medialis effectively, particularly when the feet are positioned lower on the platform.',
			'Sit in a leg press machine with your back and head resting against the padded support. Place your feet about hip-width apart on the lower part of the platform. Extend your legs to push the platform away, then slowly lower back to the starting position without letting the weights stack completely rest. Ensure your knees don’t bow inward. Perform 8-12 repetitions.'),
		(17, 'Single-Leg Balance & Reach', 'Balancing exercises challenge and strengthen the stabilizing muscles in the lower leg, including the Peroneus Longus.',
			'Stand on one leg with your knee slightly bent. Slowly reach forward with the opposite hand, extending your reach as far as you can while maintaining balance. Return to the upright position. Repeat 10 times, then switch legs. For added challenge, perform this exercise on an unstable surface like a cushion or balance board.'),
		(17, 'Standing Eversion with Band', 'This exercise focuses on eversion of the foot, directly engaging the Peroneus Longus.',
			'Attach one end of a resistance band to a sturdy object and the other end around the outside of your foot. Stand with the band anchored to your side and move your foot outward, away from your midline, against the resistance of the band. Return to the starting position and repeat for 10-15 repetitions. Switch feet and repeat the exercise.'),
		(18, 'Standing Calf Raises', 'This exercise targets the gastrocnemius muscle effectively, increasing its strength and endurance.',
			'Stand on a step or a raised platform with your toes on the edge and your heels hanging off. Hold onto a support for balance. Rise up on your toes, lifting your heels as high as possible. Pause at the top, then slowly lower your heels back down below the level of the step for a full stretch. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(18, 'Seated Calf Raises', 'While the seated position emphasizes the soleus muscle, it also engages the gastrocnemius when performed with a full range of motion.',
			'Sit on a calf raise machine or a bench with a weight pad across your thighs. Place the balls of your feet on a raised surface with your heels hanging off. Press upward through your toes to raise your heels as high as possible. Slowly lower back to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(18, 'Jump Rope', 'Jumping rope is an excellent cardiovascular exercise that also effectively strengthens the gastrocnemius.',
			'Hold the handles of a jump rope with your hands and stand with your feet slightly apart. Rotate your wrists to swing the rope over your head and jump over it with both feet as it comes to the ground. Keep your jumps small and quick for a high-intensity workout focused on the calves. Continue for several minutes as part of your cardio and leg workout routine.'),
		(19, 'Toe Raises', 'This exercise specifically targets the tibialis anterior by isolating dorsiflexion of the foot.',
			'Stand with your back leaning against a wall and your feet flat on the ground about hip-width apart. Keep your heels on the floor and lift your toes and the balls of your feet as high as possible. Hold for a moment at the top, then slowly lower your feet back to the floor. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(19, 'Dorsiflexion with Resistance Band', 'Using a resistance band increases the intensity of the exercise for the tibialis anterior.',
			'Sit on the floor with your legs straight out in front of you. Loop a resistance band around your foot and hold the ends with your hands. Pull the band towards you to create tension. Flex your foot towards your shin against the resistance of the band. Slowly return to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(20, 'Toe Raises', 'Toe raises help to strengthen the muscles responsible for toe extension and foot dorsiflexion.',
			'Stand with your back leaning against a wall and your feet flat on the ground about hip-width apart. Keep your heels on the floor and lift your toes and the balls of your feet as high as possible. Hold for a moment at the top, then slowly lower your feet back to the floor. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(20, 'Resistance Band Toe Extensions', 'Using a resistance band for toe extensions enhances the activation of the extensor muscles in the foot and lower leg.',
			'Sit with your legs extended in front of you and loop a resistance band around the toes of one foot, anchoring the other end to a stable object in front of you. Extend your toes against the resistance, then slowly return them to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(21, 'Seated Calf Raises', 'While the seated position emphasizes the soleus muscle, it also engages the gastrocnemius when performed with a full range of motion.',
			'Sit on a calf raise machine or a bench with a weight pad across your thighs. Place the balls of your feet on a raised surface with your heels hanging off. Press upward through your toes to raise your heels as high as possible. Slowly lower back to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(21, 'Donkey Calf Raises', 'While this exercise primarily targets the gastrocnemius, bending the knees slightly shifts more emphasis to the soleus.',
			'Lean forward and place your hands on a sturdy surface or have someone sit on your lower back for added resistance. Keep your legs straight or slightly bent at the knees. Push through the balls of your feet to raise your heels as high as you can, focusing on the calf contraction. Lower slowly to the starting position. Repeat for 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(22, 'Barbell Curl', 'This classic exercise targets the biceps brachii effectively, promoting growth and strength.',
			'Stand with your feet shoulder-width apart, holding a barbell with an underhand grip, hands also shoulder-width apart. Keep your elbows close to your torso. Curl the barbell upwards towards your chest, without swinging your back. Squeeze your biceps at the top of the movement, then slowly lower the barbell back to the starting position. Perform 8-12 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(22, 'Hammer Curl', 'Hammer curls target the biceps brachii and the brachialis, an adjacent muscle, enhancing the overall thickness of the arms.',
			'Stand or sit with your back straight and a dumbbell in each hand, arms hanging by your sides, palms facing towards your torso. Keep your elbows fixed and wrists straight as you curl the weights towards your shoulders. Lower the dumbbells back to the starting position with a controlled motion. Perform 8-12 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(22, 'Concentration Curl', 'Concentration curls isolate the biceps brachii, reducing the involvement of other muscles and increasing intensity.',
			'Sit on the edge of a bench with your legs wide apart. Hold a dumbbell in one hand, and brace your elbow against the inside of your thigh, just past your knee. Curl the dumbbell up towards your shoulder, focusing on contracting the bicep. Slowly lower the weight back down. Perform 8-12 repetitions on each arm for 3 sets.'),
		(23, 'Hammer Curl', 'Hammer curls target the biceps brachii and the brachialis, an adjacent muscle, enhancing the overall thickness of the arms.',
			'Stand or sit with your back straight and a dumbbell in each hand, arms hanging by your sides, palms facing towards your torso. Keep your elbows fixed and wrists straight as you curl the weights towards your shoulders. Lower the dumbbells back to the starting position with a controlled motion. Perform 8-12 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(23, 'Reverse Grip Barbell Curls', 'This variation of the traditional barbell curl utilizes an overhand grip to shift more of the workload to the brachialis and the brachioradialis.',
			'Stand with your feet shoulder-width apart, holding a barbell with an overhand grip, hands shoulder-width apart. Keep your elbows close to your torso. Curl the barbell upwards toward your chest, keeping your back and wrists straight. Contract your brachialis and biceps at the top of the movement, then slowly lower the barbell back to the starting position. Perform 8-12 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(23, 'Incline Dumbbell Curls', 'Incline dumbbell curls help isolate the brachialis by altering the angle of the arm relative to the torso, increasing the stretch and range of motion during the exercise.',
			'Sit on an incline bench set to 45-60 degrees with a dumbbell in each hand hanging down at your sides. Keep your elbows close to your torso and rotate your palms so they face forward. Without moving your upper arms, curl the dumbbells upward to shoulder level while contracting your biceps and brachialis. Slowly lower the weights back to the starting position. Perform 8-12 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(24, 'Wrist Pronation and Supination', 'This exercise targets the muscles involved in rotating the forearm, including the Pronator Teres.',
			'Sit on a bench or chair with your forearm resting on your thigh or a table, holding a dumbbell vertically with your thumb facing upward at the start. Rotate your wrist to turn the dumbbell until your thumb points downward, then rotate back to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions on each arm for 3 sets.'),
		(24, 'Dumbbell Hammer Curls', 'While primarily a biceps exercise, hammer curls also engage the Pronator Teres due to the neutral grip.',
			'Stand or sit with a dumbbell in each hand, arms hanging by your sides, palms facing each other. Keep your elbows close to your torso and your upper arms stationary. Curl the weights as you keep your palms facing each other. Continue to lift the weights until the dumbbells are at shoulder level. Slowly lower the dumbbells back to the starting position. Perform 8-12 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(25, 'Hammer Curl', 'Hammer curls are excellent for targeting the brachioradialis due to the neutral grip, which emphasizes this muscle over the biceps brachii.',
			'Stand or sit with your back straight and a dumbbell in each hand, arms hanging by your sides, palms facing towards your torso. Keep your elbows fixed and wrists straight as you curl the weights towards your shoulders. Lower the dumbbells back to the starting position with a controlled motion. Perform 8-12 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(25, 'Reverse Grip Barbell Curls', 'This variation of the traditional barbell curl uses an overhand grip to put more emphasis on the brachioradialis and forearm extensors.',
			'Stand with your feet shoulder-width apart, holding a barbell with an overhand grip, hands shoulder-width apart. Keep your elbows close to your torso. Curl the barbell upwards toward your chest, keeping your back and wrists straight. Contract your brachialis and biceps at the top of the movement, then slowly lower the barbell back to the starting position. Perform 8-12 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(25, 'Reverse Cable Curl', 'Using a cable machine for reverse curls provides continuous tension on the brachioradialis throughout the exercise.',
			'ttach a straight bar to a low pulley cable machine. Stand facing the machine, grab the bar with an overhand grip, and step back slightly. Keep your elbows close to your body and curl the bar towards your chest, keeping your wrists straight. Slowly lower the bar back down to the starting position. Perform 8-12 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(26, 'Wrist Extensions', 'Wrist extensions target the extensor muscles of the forearm, enhancing strength and mobility in the wrist.',
			'Sit at a table with your forearm resting on the surface, wrist just beyond the edge, and palm facing down. Hold a light dumbbell in your hand. Lift the dumbbell by extending your wrist upward, then slowly lower it back to the starting position. Ensure that the movement is focused on the wrist. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(26, 'Reverse Wrist Curls', 'Reverse wrist curls specifically strengthen the wrist extensor group, including the Extensor Carpi Radialis Longus.',
			'Sit with your forearms on a flat surface or your knees, hands hanging over the edge, palms facing down. Use either a barbell or dumbbells. Curl your wrists upwards, moving only your hands. Hold the top position briefly, then lower the weights under control back to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(26, 'Dumbell Wrist Twist', 'This exercise focuses on the rotation and extension of the wrist, targeting the wrist extensors dynamically.',
			'Hold a dumbbell in one hand with your forearm resting on a bench or your thigh so that only your wrist is hanging off. Start with your thumb facing upwards. Twist your wrist to turn the dumbbell so your thumb points downwards, then return to the starting position. Perform 10-12 repetitions on each side for 3 sets.'),
		(27, 'Wrist Extensions', 'This exercise isolates and strengthens the wrist extensors, including the Extensor Carpi Radialis Brevis.',
			'Sit at a table with your forearm resting on the surface, wrist just beyond the edge, and palm facing down. Hold a light dumbbell in your hand. Lift the dumbbell by extending your wrist upward, then slowly lower it back to the starting position. Ensure that the movement is focused on the wrist. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(27, 'Reverse Wrist Curls', 'Reverse wrist curls effectively target the extensor muscles of the forearm, improving strength and flexibility.',
			'Sit with your forearms on a flat surface or your knees, hands hanging over the edge, palms facing down. Use either a barbell or dumbbells. Curl your wrists upwards, moving only your hands. Hold the top position briefly, then lower the weights under control back to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(28, 'Dumbbell Shrugs', 'Shrugs specifically target the elevation aspect of the scapula, directly engaging the Levator Scapulae.',
			'Stand with feet shoulder-width apart, holding a dumbbell in each hand with arms hanging by your sides. Elevate your shoulders towards your ears in a shrugging motion, hold for a brief moment, and then lower them back down. Repeat for the desired number of repetitions.'),
		(28, 'Neck Retraction', 'This exercise helps in stretching and strengthening the Levator Scapulae by moving the neck and upper back into extension and retraction.',
			'Sit or stand with your spine in a neutral position. Slowly draw your head directly backward, keeping your chin down, and retracting your neck. Imagine you are making a double chin. Hold this position for 5-10 seconds, then relax and return to the starting position. Repeat 10 times for 3 sets.'),
		(28, 'Prone Y Lifts', 'Prone Y lifts engage the scapulae elevators and stabilizers, including the Levator Scapulae, in a prone position.',
			'Lie face down on a bench or the floor with your arms extended overhead in a "Y" position, thumbs pointing up. Lift your arms off the ground by squeezing your shoulder blades together and slightly upward. Hold for a few seconds at the top of the movement, then slowly lower your arms back to the starting position. Perform 10-12 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(29, 'Seated Row', 'The seated row is a classic exercise that targets the muscles of the upper back, including the rhomboid minor, promoting scapular retraction and stability.',
			'Sit at a cable rowing machine with your feet secured and your knees slightly bent. Grab the handle with both hands using a neutral grip. Pull the handle towards your lower abdomen while keeping your back straight and elbows close to your body. Squeeze your shoulder blades together as you pull. Slowly return to the starting position, allowing your arms to extend fully. Perform 10-12 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(29, 'Single-Arm Dumbbell Row', 'Dumbbell rows focus on the retraction of the scapula and are excellent for strengthening the rhomboid muscles.',
			'Place one knee on a bench, the other foot on the floor, lean forward slightly, and support your body with your free hand. With a dumbbell in the other hand, pull the dumbbell upward to the side of your torso, keeping your torso stationary. Lower it back down and repeat for 8-12 repetitions before switching sides.'),
		(29, 'Prone T Lifts', 'This exercise enhances scapular control and strengthens the upper back muscles, particularly the rhomboids.',
			'Lie face down on a flat bench or the floor with your arms extended out to the sides, forming a T-shape, thumbs pointing upward. Lift your arms up by squeezing your shoulder blades together, keeping your arms straight. Hold at the top for a moment, then lower them back to the starting position. Perform 10-12 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(30, 'Bent-Over Dumbbell Rows', 'This exercise targets the rhomboids and helps strengthen the middle part of the back.',
			'Hold a dumbbell in each hand and stand with your feet shoulder-width apart. Bend your knees slightly and lean forward by hinging at the waist, keeping your back nearly parallel to the floor and spine neutral. Let the dumbbells hang directly in front of you with arms extended. Pull the dumbbells up towards your chest, keeping your elbows close to your body and squeezing your shoulder blades together at the top. Lower the weights slowly back to the starting position. Perform 8-12 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(30, 'T-Bar Rows', 'T-Bar rows are effective for engaging the rhomboid major, along with other back muscles like the latissimus dorsi and trapezius.',
			'Load a T-bar row machine with the appropriate weight. Straddle the bar and grasp the handles with both hands. Keep your back straight and slightly bend your knees. Pull the bar towards your chest, keeping your elbows close to your body. Focus on squeezing your shoulder blades together as you row. Slowly lower the weight back to the starting position. Perform 8-12 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(30, 'Face Pulls', 'Face pulls are excellent for targeting the upper back muscles, particularly the rhomboids and rear deltoids, improving posture and shoulder stability.',
			'Attach a rope to a high pulley of a cable machine. Pull the rope towards your face while you externally rotate your hands (palms facing out by the end of the movement). Your hands should come beside or just behind your ears. Focus on squeezing your shoulder blades together at the end of the movement before slowly returning to the starting position. Repeat for the desired number of repetitions.'),
		(31, 'Seated Row', 'Although primarily targeting the mid-back muscles, the seated row also engages the upper back muscles, including the serratus posterior superior, when performed with a focus on squeezing the shoulder blades together.',
			'Sit at a cable rowing machine with your feet secured and your knees slightly bent. Grab the handle with both hands using a neutral grip. Pull the handle towards your lower abdomen while keeping your back straight and elbows close to your body. Squeeze your shoulder blades together as you pull. Slowly return to the starting position, allowing your arms to extend fully. Perform 10-12 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(31, 'Upright Rows', 'Upright rows help strengthen the shoulders and upper back, including the serratus posterior superior, by elevating the ribcage during the lift.',
			'Stand with your feet shoulder-width apart, holding a barbell or dumbbells in front of you with an overhand grip. Lift the weights vertically up along your body toward your chin, keeping them close to your body. Elbows should be higher than your forearms at the top of the movement. Lower the weights back down slowly. Perform 8-10 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(32, 'Bent-Over Rows', 'Bent-over rows target the muscles of the middle and lower back, including the serratus posterior inferior, by promoting scapular retraction and depression.',
			'Stand with your feet shoulder-width apart, knees slightly bent. Bend forward at the waist so your back is nearly parallel to the floor. Hold a barbell or dumbbells with an overhand grip. Pull the weight towards your lower stomach, keeping the elbows close to your body and squeezing your shoulder blades together. Lower the weight slowly back to the starting position. Perform 8-12 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(32, 'Good Mornings', 'This exercise engages the lower back and core muscles, indirectly involving the serratus posterior inferior through the stabilization required during the movement.',
			'Stand with your feet shoulder-width apart, a barbell resting on your shoulders (behind your neck). Keeping your legs straight and back flat, bend forward at the hips as if you are bowing, until your upper body is parallel to the floor. Return to the upright position. Perform 8-10 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(32, 'Pull-Ups', ' While primarily an upper back and lat exercise, pull-ups also involve the serratus posterior inferior through the downward movement and stabilization of the scapula.',
			'Grip an overhead bar with a wide overhand grip. Hang fully extended, pull yourself up until your chin is above the bar, and then lower yourself back to the starting position. Keep your movements smooth and controlled. Perform as many repetitions as you can.'),
		(33, 'Neck Extensions', 'Neck extensions target the muscles at the back of the neck, particularly the Splenius Capitis, promoting strength and flexibility.',
			'Lie face down on a bench with your head hanging off the edge. Start with your head in a naturally lowered position towards the floor. Slowly lift your head up and back as far as comfortably possible, using the muscles in the back of your neck. Hold the top position briefly, then lower your head back down to the starting position. Perform 8-10 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(33, 'Lateral Neck Flexion with Resistance', 'This exercise involves the lateral movement of the neck against resistance, working the Splenius Capitis and associated muscles.',
			'Sit or stand with a resistance band looped around a fixed object and the other end around your head. The band should be positioned on the side of your head just above your ear. Move your head laterally, bringing your ear towards your shoulder against the resistance of the band. Return to the starting position. Perform 8-10 repetitions on each side for 3 sets.'),
		(34, 'Isometric Neck Extensions', 'This exercise helps strengthen the neck extensors, including the Splenius Cervicis, without moving the head, minimizing the risk of strain.',
			'Lie face down on a bench with your head hanging off the edge. Start with your head in a naturally lowered position towards the floor. Slowly lift your head up and back as far as comfortably possible, using the muscles in the back of your neck. Hold the top position briefly, then lower your head back down to the starting position. Perform 8-10 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(34, 'Lateral Neck Flexion', 'This exercise targets the lateral movement of the neck, engaging the Splenius Cervicis along with other cervical muscles.',
			'Maintain a straight posture while sitting or standing. Tilt your head to bring your ear toward the shoulder without lifting the shoulder. Hold for a few seconds, then return to the starting position and repeat on the other side. Perform 10-15 repetitions on each side.'),
		(35, 'Back Extensions', 'Back extensions target the lower back muscles, particularly the erector spinae group, which includes the Spinalis. This exercise helps strengthen the back and improve spinal stability.',
			'Lie face down on a back extension bench or a stability ball with your feet anchored. Cross your arms over your chest or place your hands behind your head. Slowly raise your upper body until your spine is in a straight line with your legs, then lower back down with control. Be careful not to hyperextend your back. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(35, 'Deadlift', 'The deadlift is a compound exercise that involves lifting a barbell from the ground to the level of the hips, then setting it back down. It engages multiple muscle groups, including the Spinalis, providing an effective full-body workout.',
			'Stand with your feet hip-width apart, with a barbell in front of your feet. Bend at your hips and knees, and grasp the barbell with your hands shoulder-width apart. Keep your back straight as you lift the bar by straightening your hips and knees. The bar should stay close to your body, and your shoulders should be back at the top of the lift. Lower the bar to the ground by bending at the hips and controlling the descent. Perform 5-8 repetitions for 3 sets, depending on the weight used.'),
		(35, 'Good Mornings', 'Good Mornings focus on the lower back, hamstrings, and glutes, and are effective for strengthening the spinal erectors, including the Spinalis.',
			'Stand with your feet shoulder-width apart, a barbell resting on your shoulders (behind your neck). Keeping your legs straight and back flat, bend forward at the hips as if you are bowing, until your upper body is parallel to the floor. Return to the upright position. Perform 8-10 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(36, 'Supermans', 'The Superman exercise is a simple and effective way to target the erector spinae muscles, including the Longissimus, which helps in improving lower back strength and stability.',
			'Lie face down on a mat with your arms extended in front of you and legs straight. Simultaneously lift your arms, legs, and chest off the floor, holding the position for a few seconds. Ensure your head and neck remain in a neutral position. Slowly lower back to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(36, 'Deadlift', 'Deadlifts are a comprehensive exercise that targets multiple muscle groups, including the Longissimus. This exercise is excellent for developing strength in the back, legs, and core.',
			'Stand with your feet hip-width apart, with a barbell in front of your feet. Bend at your hips and knees, and grasp the barbell with your hands shoulder-width apart. Keep your back straight as you lift the bar by straightening your hips and knees. The bar should stay close to your body, and your shoulders should be back at the top of the lift. Lower the bar to the ground by bending at the hips and controlling the descent. Perform 5-8 repetitions for 3 sets, depending on the weight used.'),
		(36, 'Barbell Rows', 'Barbell rows primarily target the upper and middle back muscles, including the Longissimus, enhancing upper body strength and muscularity.',
			'Bend your knees slightly and bend over the bar with your back straight. Grab the barbell with a grip wider than shoulder width. Pull the bar towards your lower ribcage while keeping the elbows close to the body. Squeeze your shoulder blades together at the top, then slowly lower the bar back to the starting position. Repeat for the desired number of repetitions.'),
		(37, 'Single-Arm Dumbbell Row', 'This exercise targets the upper back muscles, including the Iliocostalis, enhancing strength and stability.',
			'Place one knee on a bench, the other foot on the floor, lean forward slightly, and support your body with your free hand. With a dumbbell in the other hand, pull the dumbbell upward to the side of your torso, keeping your torso stationary. Lower it back down and repeat for 8-12 repetitions before switching sides.'),
		(37, 'Seated or Standing Cable Row', 'Cable rows target the back muscles comprehensively, emphasizing the erector spinae group.',
			'Sit or stand at a cable row station with your feet securely braced. Grab the handle using both hands. Pull the handle toward your torso, keeping your back straight and your elbows close to your body. Focus on pulling with your back muscles rather than your arms and squeezing your shoulder blades together at the end of the movement. Slowly return the handle to the starting position while maintaining control. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(37, 'Back Extensions', 'Back extensions specifically strengthen the lower back and are particularly effective for the erector spinae muscles.',
			'Lie face down on a back extension bench or a stability ball with your feet anchored. Cross your arms over your chest or place your hands behind your head. Slowly raise your upper body until your spine is in a straight line with your legs, then lower back down with control. Be careful not to hyperextend your back. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(38, 'Supermans', 'The Superman exercise targets the erector spinae muscles, which include the Semispinalis, improving strength and endurance in the lower and upper back.',
			'Lie face down on a mat with your arms extended in front of you and legs straight. Simultaneously lift your arms, legs, and chest off the floor, holding the position for a few seconds. Ensure your head and neck remain in a neutral position. Slowly lower back to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(38, 'Prone Cobra', 'The Prone Cobra is a low-impact exercise that engages the muscles of the back, particularly the erector spinae and the deeper back muscles like the Semispinalis.',
			'Lie face down on the floor with your arms at your sides and palms facing up. Slowly lift your chest off the ground while simultaneously rotating your arms so your thumbs point towards the ceiling. Hold this position, squeezing your shoulder blades together, for 10-30 seconds. Relax back to the starting position. Perform 3-5 repetitions.'),
		(39, 'Bird-Dog', 'The Bird-Dog is a core body exercise that strengthens the lower back and abdominal muscles, improving balance and spinal stability by engaging the Multifidus.',
			'Begin on your hands and knees with your hands directly under your shoulders and knees under your hips. Extend one arm forward and the opposite leg back, keeping both your arm and leg parallel to the floor. Hold this position for a few seconds while maintaining balance and stability, then switch to the other arm and leg. Focus on keeping your back straight and your hips level. Perform 10-15 repetitions on each side for 3 sets.'),
		(39, 'Plank', 'Planks are a core-strengthening exercise that also engages and strengthens the spinal stabilizers, including the Multifidus.',
			'Start in a prone position on the floor, supporting your weight on your forearms and toes. Your elbows should be bent and directly below your shoulders. Form a straight line from your head to your heels, and hold this position for 20-60 seconds while keeping your abdominal muscles engaged and your body rigid. Avoid letting your hips sag or lift. Perform for several sets.'),
		(40, 'Standing Cable Curl', 'This exercise specifically targets the flexion movement of the shoulder, engaging the Coracobrachialis effectively.',
			'Attach a handle to a low cable machine. Stand facing the machine and grab the handle with one hand. Keep your elbow slightly bent, and pull the handle straight up in front of you, keeping your arm close to your body. Lift the handle until it is level with your shoulder, then slowly lower it back down. Perform 10-12 repetitions on each arm for 3 sets.'),
		(40, 'Incline Dumbbell Curl', 'While primarily targeting the biceps, the incline angle of this exercise also puts emphasis on the Coracobrachialis due to the arms extended position from the body.',
			'Sit on an incline bench with your back supported and a dumbbell in each hand, arms fully extended. Curl the dumbbells towards your shoulders while keeping your elbows still and back against the bench. Slowly lower the weights back to the starting position. Perform 8-10 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(41, 'Close-Grip Bench Press', 'The close-grip bench press is a variation of the traditional bench press that places more emphasis on the triceps muscles by using a narrower grip.',
			'Lie on a flat bench with your feet flat on the floor. Grasp the barbell with a grip narrower than shoulder width. Lower the bar slowly to your chest while keeping your elbows close to your body. Press the bar back up to the starting position by extending your arms fully. Perform 8-12 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(41, 'Tricep Dips', 'Triceps dips are a powerful bodyweight exercise that targets the triceps muscles by using your own body weight as resistance.',
			'Use parallel bars or a bench for this exercise. If using parallel bars, grip the bars and hoist yourself up, arms straight. Lower your body by bending your arms, keeping your elbows close to your body. Dip down until your elbows are at about a 90-degree angle, then press up to the starting position. If using a bench, place your hands on the bench behind you, extend your legs out, and perform the dip motion. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(41, 'Overhead Tricep Extension', 'This exercise isolates the triceps brachii by extending the arms overhead, which is excellent for targeting the long head of the triceps.',
			'Stand or sit with your back straight, holding a dumbbell with both hands. Lift the dumbbell overhead, arms extended. Slowly bend your elbows to lower the dumbbell behind your head. Keep your elbows close to your ears and your upper arms stationary. Extend your arms to lift the dumbbell back to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(42, 'Reverse Wrist Curls', 'Reverse wrist curls target the wrist extensors but also engage the flexors during the controlled lowering phase of the exercise.',
			'Sit with your forearms on a flat surface or your knees, hands hanging over the edge, palms facing down. Use either a barbell or dumbbells. Curl your wrists upwards, moving only your hands. Hold the top position briefly, then lower the weights under control back to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(42, 'Wrist Curls', 'Wrist curls are a fundamental exercise targeting the wrist flexors, including the Flexor Carpi Ulnaris.',
			'Sit on a bench with your forearms on your thighs and your wrists hanging over the edge, palms up. Hold a dumbbell in each hand. Curl your wrists upwards towards your body, focusing on using your wrist flexors. Slowly lower the weights back to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(43, 'Reverse Wrist Curls', 'Reverse wrist curls primarily target the wrist extensors but also involve the flexors, including the Palmaris Longus, during the controlled lowering phase of the exercise.',
			'Sit with your forearms on a flat surface or your knees, hands hanging over the edge, palms facing down. Use either a barbell or dumbbells. Curl your wrists upwards, moving only your hands. Hold the top position briefly, then lower the weights under control back to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(43, 'Wrist Curls', 'Wrist curls are effective for targeting the wrist flexors, including the Palmaris Longus, which is involved in the flexing of the wrist.',
			'Sit on a bench with your forearms on your thighs and your wrists hanging over the edge, palms up. Hold a dumbbell in each hand. Curl your wrists upwards towards your body, focusing on using your wrist flexors. Slowly lower the weights back to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(44, 'Finger Curls', 'Finger curls specifically target the finger flexors, including the Flexor Digitorum Superficialis, which is crucial for improving gripping power.',
			'Sit or stand with your forearm resting on a table with your hand hanging off the edge, palm up. Hold a barbell or dumbbell in your hand. Allow the weight to roll down to your fingers, then curl your fingers to lift the weight as high as possible. Lower the weight slowly back to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(44, 'Grip Stregtheners', 'Using grip strengtheners or hand grippers can effectively target the Flexor Digitorum Superficialis and improve hand strength.',
			'Hold a grip strengthener in your hand. Squeeze the handles together as tightly as possible and hold the squeeze for a few seconds before releasing. Repeat this action 10-20 times for 3 sets on each hand.'),
		(45, 'Finger Curls', 'Finger curls with a dumbbell help improve the flexion capabilities of the fingers, specifically engaging the Flexor Digitorum Profundus.',
			'Sit or stand with your forearm resting on a table with your hand hanging off the edge, palm up. Hold a barbell or dumbbell in your hand. Allow the weight to roll down to your fingers, then curl your fingers to lift the weight as high as possible. Lower the weight slowly back to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(45, 'Grip Stregtheners', 'Grip strengtheners are effective tools for enhancing the strength of the finger flexors, including the Flexor Digitorum Profundus.',
			'Hold a grip strengthener in your hand. Squeeze the handles together as tightly as possible and hold the squeeze for a few seconds before releasing. Repeat this action 10-20 times for 3 sets on each hand.'),
		(46, 'Dumbbell Pinch Grips', 'Pinch grips strengthen the muscles involved in pinching, including the Flexor Pollicis Longus.',
			'Place a small dumbbell vertically on a flat surface. Use your thumb and each finger to pinch and lift the dumbbell, holding it for a few seconds before setting it back down. Perform this exercise for several sets, trying to increase the duration of the pinch as strength improves.'),
		(46, 'Grip Stregtheners', 'Grip Stegtheners are excellent for developing overall grip strength, including the muscles of the thumb.',
			'Hold a grip strengthener in your hand. Squeeze the handles together as tightly as possible and hold the squeeze for a few seconds before releasing. Repeat this action 10-20 times for 3 sets on each hand.'),
		(47, 'Wrist Roller', 'The wrist roller is an effective tool for strengthening the forearm muscles, including the Pronator Quadratus, through repetitive pronation and supination.',
			'Stand or sit with your arms extended holding the wrist roller with both hands. Rotate your wrists to wind the rope and lift the weight, then slowly reverse the motion to lower it. This exercise works by repeatedly pronating and supinating the forearms. Perform until fatigue for 2-3 sets.'),
		(48, 'Reverse Wrist Curls', 'Reverse wrist curls target the extensor muscles in the forearm, which are responsible for lifting the back of the hand.',
			'Sit with your forearms on a flat surface or your knees, hands hanging over the edge, palms facing down. Use either a barbell or dumbbells. Curl your wrists upwards, moving only your hands. Hold the top position briefly, then lower the weights under control back to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(48, 'Finger Extensions', 'This exercise targets the extensor muscles of the fingers, enhancing the ability to extend the fingers against resistance.',
			'Sit or stand with your arm extended. Place a rubber band around all your fingers, including the thumb if you want to increase the difficulty. Slowly extend your fingers outward against the resistance of the band, then slowly allow them to return to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(49, 'Reverse Wrist Curls', 'While primarily targeting the wrist extensors, reverse wrist curls also engage the extensors of the fingers, including the Extensor Digiti Minimi.',
			'Sit with your forearms on a flat surface or your knees, hands hanging over the edge, palms facing down. Use either a barbell or dumbbells. Curl your wrists upwards, moving only your hands. Hold the top position briefly, then lower the weights under control back to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(49, 'Finger Extensions', 'This exercise targets the extensor muscles of the fingers, particularly focusing on extending the little finger.',
			'Sit or stand with your arm extended. Place a rubber band around all your fingers, including the thumb if you want to increase the difficulty. Slowly extend your fingers outward against the resistance of the band, then slowly allow them to return to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(50, 'Reverse Wrist Curls', 'Reverse wrist curls primarily target the wrist extensors and help in strengthening the Extensor Carpi Ulnaris.',
			'Sit with your forearms on a flat surface or your knees, hands hanging over the edge, palms facing down. Use either a barbell or dumbbells. Curl your wrists upwards, moving only your hands. Hold the top position briefly, then lower the weights under control back to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(50, 'Wrist Roller', 'The wrist roller is an effective tool for developing forearm strength, engaging both the flexor and extensor muscles, including the Extensor Carpi Ulnaris.',
			'Stand or sit with your arms extended holding the wrist roller with both hands. Rotate your wrists to wind the rope and lift the weight, then slowly reverse the motion to lower it. This exercise works by repeatedly pronating and supinating the forearms. Perform until fatigue for 2-3 sets.'),
		(51, 'Tricep Dips', 'Tricep dips not only target the larger triceps brachii but also engage the Anconeus due to its role in elbow extension.',
			'Use parallel bars or a bench for this exercise. If using parallel bars, grip the bars and hoist yourself up, arms straight. Lower your body by bending your arms, keeping your elbows close to your body. Dip down until your elbows are at about a 90-degree angle, then press up to the starting position. If using a bench, place your hands on the bench behind you, extend your legs out, and perform the dip motion. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(51, 'Overhead Tricep Extension', 'Overhead tricep extensions specifically target the tricep group and indirectly work the Anconeus by extending the elbow.',
			'Stand or sit with your back straight, holding a dumbbell with both hands. Lift the dumbbell overhead, arms extended. Slowly bend your elbows to lower the dumbbell behind your head. Keep your elbows close to your ears and your upper arms stationary. Extend your arms to lift the dumbbell back to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(51, 'Push-Ups', 'Push-ups are a compound exercise that targets the chest, shoulders, and triceps, including the Anconeus, providing functional strength and stability.',
			'Start in a plank position with your hands slightly wider than your shoulders. Lower your body until your chest nearly touches the floor. Keep your elbows close to your body to maximize pectoral activation. Push back up to the start position and repeat. Perform sets of 10-20 repetitions based on your fitness level.'),
		(52, 'Dumbbell Supination', 'This exercise isolates the supination movement, directly targeting the Supinator muscle.',
			'Sit or stand with a dumbbell in one hand, arm at your side and elbow bent at a 90-degree angle. Start with your palm facing your body. Rotate your forearm so that your palm ends facing upward, holding the dumbbell securely. Slowly rotate back to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets on each arm.'),
		(52, 'Forearm Rotations with a Dumbbell', 'This exercise also focuses on the supination and pronation of the forearm, enhancing the strength and flexibility of the Supinator.',
			'Sit with your forearm resting on your thigh or a table, so your wrist extends beyond the knee or edge. Hold a dumbbell vertically in your hand. Rotate the dumbbell outward to supinate your forearm fully, then inward to pronate. Keep your movements controlled and focused. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(53, 'Thumb Lifts', 'Thumb lifts are a simple but effective way to engage the Abductor Pollicis Longus without the need for equipment.',
			'Place your hand flat on a table with all fingers extended. Lift your thumb as high off the table as possible, keeping the rest of your fingers flat. Hold the lifted position for a few seconds, then slowly lower your thumb back to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets on each hand.'),
		(54, 'Reverse Wrist Curls', 'While primarily targeting the wrist extensors, reverse wrist curls also engage the thumb extensors, including the Extensor Pollicis Brevis.',
			'Sit with your forearms on a flat surface or your knees, hands hanging over the edge, palms facing down. Use either a barbell or dumbbells. Curl your wrists upwards, moving only your hands. Hold the top position briefly, then lower the weights under control back to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(55, 'Reverse Wrist Curls', 'While primarily targeting the wrist extensors, reverse wrist curls also engage the thumb extensors, including the Extensor Pollicis Longus.',
			'Sit with your forearms on a flat surface or your knees, hands hanging over the edge, palms facing down. Use either a barbell or dumbbells. Curl your wrists upwards, moving only your hands. Hold the top position briefly, then lower the weights under control back to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(56, 'Finger Extensions', 'Using a rubber band to provide resistance, this exercise helps strengthen all finger extensors, with focus possible on the index finger.',
			'Sit or stand with your arm extended. Place a rubber band around all your fingers, including the thumb if you want to increase the difficulty. Slowly extend your fingers outward against the resistance of the band, then slowly allow them to return to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(57, 'Wrist Roller', 'The wrist roller is an effective tool for developing forearm strength, engaging both the flexors and extensors, including the Flexor Carpi Radialis.',
			'Stand or sit with your arms extended holding the wrist roller with both hands. Rotate your wrists to wind the rope and lift the weight, then slowly reverse the motion to lower it. This exercise works by repeatedly pronating and supinating the forearms. Perform until fatigue for 2-3 sets.'),
		(58, 'Chest Dips', 'Chest dips primarily target the lower part of the Pectoralis Major but also significantly engage the Pectoralis Minor, particularly when leaning forward.',
			'Use parallel bars or a dip station for this exercise. Grip the bars, jump up, and stabilize your body with arms straight. Lean slightly forward and bend your elbows to lower your body until your elbows are at about a 90-degree angle. Push back up to the starting position, focusing on using your chest and shoulders. Perform 8-12 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(58, 'Push-Away Shoulder Protraction', 'This exercise focuses on shoulder protraction, directly engaging the Pectoralis Minor.',
			'Start in a plank position with your arms straight under your shoulders on the floor. Without bending your elbows, push your torso away from the floor by rounding your shoulders and spreading your shoulder blades apart. Hold this protracted position for a moment, then relax back to the neutral plank position. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(59, 'Dumbbell Shrugs', 'While primarily targeting the upper trapezius, shoulder shrugs also indirectly engage the Subclavius by involving the movement and stabilization of the clavicle.',
			'Stand with feet shoulder-width apart, holding a dumbbell in each hand with arms hanging by your sides. Elevate your shoulders towards your ears in a shrugging motion, hold for a brief moment, and then lower them back down. Repeat for the desired number of repetitions.'),
		(60, 'Twisting Crunches', 'Twisting crunches engage the core and oblique muscles, including the intercostals, by adding a rotational component to the standard crunch.',
			'Lie on your back with your knees bent and hands behind your head. Curl up and rotate your torso so one elbow moves toward the opposite knee. Alternate sides with each repetition. Ensure you perform the movement slowly and with control to maximize engagement of the intercostal muscles. Perform 10-15 repetitions on each side for 3 sets.'),
		(61, 'Side Planks', 'The side plank primarily targets the obliques but also effectively engages the intercostal muscles due to the stabilization required along the side of the ribcage.',
			'Lie on your side with your legs extended and your elbow directly under your shoulder. Lift your hips off the ground to form a straight line from your feet to your head. Hold this position for 20-30 seconds, then switch to the other side. Keep your core engaged and hips elevated throughout the exercise. Perform 2-3 sets on each side.'),
		(62, 'Squats', 'Squats are a fundamental exercise that targets the Gluteus Maximus, along with the quadriceps and hamstrings.',
			'Stand with your feet shoulder-width apart, toes slightly pointed out. Keep your back straight and chest up as you bend your knees and hips to lower your body as if sitting back into a chair. Keep your knees in line with your toes. Lower down until your thighs are at least parallel to the ground, then drive through your heels to return to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(62, 'Deadlifts', 'Deadlifts engage the lower back, hamstrings, and particularly the Gluteus Maximus, making it a powerful exercise for building lower body strength.',
			'Stand with your feet hip-width apart, with a barbell in front of your shins. Bend at your hips and knees, grasp the barbell with an overhand grip. Keep your back flat and chest up as you lift the bar by straightening your hips and knees. Keep the bar close to your body as you rise. Lower the bar to the ground by hinging at the hips and bending your knees. Perform 5-8 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(62, 'Hip Thrusts', 'Hip thrusts are highly effective in isolating and strengthening the Gluteus Maximus.',
			'Sit on the ground with your upper back against a bench, knees bent, and feet flat on the floor. Place a weighted barbell over your hips. Drive through your heels, extending your hips vertically through the barbell. Squeeze your glutes at the top of the movement for a second. Lower the barbell back to the starting position. Perform 8-12 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(62, 'Side-Lying Hip Abduction', 'This exercise isolates and targets the Gluteus Medius by moving the leg away from the midline of the body.',
			'Lie on your side with your legs stacked and your body in a straight line. Rest your head on your lower arm, and brace your upper hand on the floor for stability. Slowly lift the top leg upwards while keeping it straight and without rotating the hip; the movement should come solely from the hip. Lower the leg back down with control. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets on each side.'),
		(63, 'Clamshells', 'Clamshells are effective in strengthening the Gluteus Medius and improving hip stability.',
			'Lie on your side with your hips and knees bent at a 45-degree angle. Keep your feet together, and lift the top knee away from the bottom one while keeping your feet in contact. Do not let your pelvis roll back during the movement. Slowly return the knee to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets on each side.'),
		(63, 'Single-Leg Bridge', 'This exercise targets both the gluteus medius and maximus, enhancing hip stability and strength.',
			'Lie on your back with your knees bent and feet flat on the floor. Extend one leg straight out. Push through the heel of the bent leg to lift your hips off the ground while keeping your extended leg raised. Squeeze your glutes at the top of the movement, ensuring your hips are lifted and even. Lower your hips back down and repeat. Perform 8-12 repetitions for 3 sets on each leg.'),
		(64, 'Side Leg Raises', 'This exercise targets the hip abductors, including the Gluteus Minimus, by lifting the leg away from the body in a lateral movement.',
			'Lie on your side with your legs stacked and your body in a straight line. Support your head with your lower arm and stabilize your upper body with your top hand on the floor in front of you. Lift the upper leg toward the ceiling while keeping it straight and without tilting your pelvis. Lower the leg back down slowly. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets on each side.'),
		(64, 'Standing Hip Abduction', 'Standing hip abduction emphasizes the Gluteus Minimuss role in moving the leg away from the midline of the body.',
			'Stand upright next to a wall or a stable support for balance. Keep your body straight and lift one leg out to the side, keeping your toe pointed forward and not allowing your torso to lean. Lower the leg back to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets on each leg.'),
		(65, 'Seated Heel Taps', 'This exercise specifically targets the rotation and stability functions of the Popliteus by engaging it in a controlled environment.',
			'Sit on a chair with your feet flat on the floor. Lift one heel off the floor while keeping your toes on the ground. Rotate your foot inward (medially), tapping the heel on the floor. Return to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions on each leg for 3 sets.'),
		(65, 'Prone Knee Flexion', 'Prone knee flexion engages the Popliteus by flexing the knee against resistance, mimicking its natural function.',
			'Lie face down on a flat surface with your legs straight. Attach a light ankle weight or use a resistance band around your ankle. Flex one knee to bring the heel toward the buttocks. Focus on the movement being controlled and initiated from the back of the knee. Slowly extend the knee back to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets on each leg.'),
		(66, 'Toe Curls', 'Toe curls target the flexor muscles of the toes, specifically engaging the Flexor Digitorum Longus.',
			'Sit with your feet flat on the floor. Place a towel on the floor under your feet and use your toes to grab and curl the towel towards you. Release and repeat the motion. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets. For added resistance, place a small weight at the end of the towel.'),
		(66, ' Toe Presses on Leg Press Machine', 'This exercise uses a leg press machine to focus on strengthening the toe flexors by pressing with the toes rather than the entire foot.',
			'Sit on a leg press machine with your feet flat against the sled. Slide your feet down so that only your toes are on the bottom edge of the sled. Press the sled by extending through your toes, focusing on flexing them as you push. Return to the starting position slowly. Perform 8-12 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(67, 'Toe Curls', 'This exercise targets the toe flexors, particularly the Flexor Hallucis Longus, by scrunching a towel with the toes.',
			'Sit with your feet flat on the floor. Place a towel on the floor under your feet and use your toes to grab and curl the towel towards you. Release and repeat the motion. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets. For added resistance, place a small weight at the end of the towel.'),
		(67, 'Big Toe Presses', 'Big toe presses focus on isolating and strengthening the big toe flexion, engaging the Flexor Hallucis Longus effectively.',
			'Sit on a chair or bench with your feet flat on the ground. Lift all your toes off the ground, then press just the big toe down while keeping the other toes lifted. Hold for a few seconds, then release. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets on each foot.'),
		(68, 'Heel Rasies', 'Heel raises specifically target the muscles supporting the arch of the foot, including the Tibialis Posterior.',
			'Stand upright on a flat surface or on the edge of a step for a greater range of motion. Raise your heels off the ground, shifting your weight onto the balls of your feet. Hold the top position for a few seconds, then slowly lower back down. To increase the focus on the Tibialis Posterior, try to curl the arch of your foot slightly as you lift. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(68, 'Single-Leg Balances', 'Single-leg balances help strengthen the muscles responsible for foot and ankle stability, including the Tibialis Posterior.',
			'Stand on one foot, keeping your supporting knee slightly bent. Maintain balance without letting your ankle collapse inward. To increase the difficulty, perform this exercise on an unstable surface like a cushion or a balance pad. Hold the balance for 30-60 seconds. Perform 2-3 sets on each leg.'),
		(69, 'Romanian Deadlift', 'The RDL targets the hamstrings, including the Biceps Femoris, focusing on hip hinge mechanics which are crucial for posterior chain development.',
			'Stand with your feet hip-width apart, holding a barbell or dumbbells in front of you. With a slight bend in your knees, hinge at your hips to lower the weights toward the floor, keeping them close to your legs. Keep your back flat and push your hips back as far as you can. When you feel a stretch in your hamstrings, reverse the movement to return to the starting position. Keep your core engaged throughout the exercise. Perform 8-12 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(69, 'Lying Leg Curls', 'This exercise isolates the hamstrings, particularly the Biceps Femoris, by flexing the knee against resistance.',
			'Lie face down on a leg curl machine, with the pad of the lever on the back of your legs just below the calf muscles. Securely grasp the support handles, curl your legs up as far as possible without lifting your upper legs from the pad. Hold at the top for a brief moment, then lower the weight slowly back to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(69, 'Stability Ball Hamstring Curl', 'This exercise engages the core and improves stability while specifically targeting the hamstring muscles.',
			'Lie on your back with your feet placed on top of a stability ball. Push your hips up into a bridge position, engaging your core. Roll the ball towards your body by bending your knees and pulling the ball with your feet. Extend your legs to roll the ball back to the starting position while keeping your hips raised throughout. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(70, 'Lying Leg Curls', 'Lying leg curls focus on isolating the hamstring muscles, including the Semitendinosus, by flexing the knee against resistance.',
			'Lie face down on a leg curl machine, with the pad of the lever on the back of your legs just above your calves. Ensure that you are positioned correctly so that the lever moves smoothly as you curl. Grasp the machines handles, curl your legs up as far as possible without lifting your upper legs from the pad, and hold briefly at the top. Slowly return to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(70, 'Stiff-Legged Deadlifts', 'Stiff-legged deadlifts target the hamstrings, glutes, and lower back, focusing on lengthening and contracting the Semitendinosus throughout the movement.',
			'Stand with your feet hip-width apart, holding a barbell or dumbbells in front of you. Keep your legs straight or slightly bent. Hinge at your hips to lower the weights toward the floor, keeping them close to your legs. Maintain a neutral spine throughout the movement. When you feel a stretch in your hamstrings, reverse the movement to return to the starting position. Perform 8-12 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(70, 'Swiss Ball Hamstring Curls', 'This exercise uses a Swiss ball to engage the hamstrings dynamically, improving muscle activation and core stability.',
			'Lie on your back with your feet on top of a Swiss ball. Lift your hips off the ground into a bridge position. Roll the ball towards your body by bending your knees and pulling the ball with your feet. Keep your hips raised throughout the movement. Extend your legs to roll the ball back to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(71, 'Romanian Deadlift', 'The RDL targets the hamstrings, including the Semimembranosus, focusing on hip hinge mechanics which are crucial for posterior chain development.',
			'Stand with your feet hip-width apart, holding a barbell or dumbbells in front of you. With a slight bend in your knees, hinge at your hips to lower the weights toward the floor, keeping them close to your legs. Keep your back flat and push your hips back as far as you can. When you feel a stretch in your hamstrings, reverse the movement to return to the starting position. Keep your core engaged throughout the exercise. Perform 8-12 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(71, 'Lying Leg Curls', 'This exercise isolates the hamstrings, particularly the Semimembranosus, by flexing the knee against resistance.',
			'Lie face down on a leg curl machine, with the pad of the lever on the back of your legs just below the calves. Securely grasp the support handles, curl your legs up as far as possible without lifting your upper legs from the pad. Hold at the top for a brief moment, then lower the weight slowly back to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(71, 'Stability Ball Hamstring Curls', 'This exercise engages the core and improves stability while specifically targeting the hamstring muscles, including the Semimembranosus.',
			'Lie on your back with your feet placed on top of a stability ball. Push your hips up into a bridge position, engaging your core. Roll the ball towards your body by bending your knees and pulling the ball with your feet. Extend your legs to roll the ball back to the starting position while keeping your hips raised throughout. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(72, 'Sumo Deadlift', 'The sumo deadlift variation puts more emphasis on the adductors and glutes compared to the conventional deadlift, targeting the Adductor Magnus effectively.',
			'Stand with your feet wider than shoulder-width apart, toes pointing outwards. Grip the barbell with hands inside your legs. Keep your back straight and chest up as you lift the barbell by straightening your hips and knees. Lock your hips at the top of the movement, then slowly lower the bar back to the ground. Perform 8-12 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(72, 'Side Lunges', 'Side lunges focus on lateral movement, engaging the adductors, particularly the Adductor Magnus, as well as the glutes and quadriceps.',
			'Stand with your feet together. Take a large step to the side, bend your stepping leg while keeping the other leg straight, and lower your body by pushing your hips back. Make sure your bent knee does not extend past your toe. Push off your bent leg to return to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions on each side for 3 sets.'),
		(72, 'Copenhagen Plank', 'This advanced exercise specifically targets the adductor muscles, including the Adductor Magnus, by challenging them to stabilize the body in a side plank position.',
			'Position yourself in a side plank with your upper body supported on your elbow and your bottom leg lifted and resting on a bench or a sturdy platform. Your top leg should hang over or rest on the bench as well. Hold this position, keeping your body straight from head to feet. Maintain the plank for 20-30 seconds, then switch sides. Perform 2-3 sets per side.'),
		(73, 'Standing Cable Hip Adduction', 'This exercise uses a cable machine to specifically target the adduction movement, isolating the Adductor Brevis and other inner thigh muscles.',
			'Attach an ankle strap to a low cable pulley and then to your ankle. Stand side on to the machine, far enough away so there is tension on the cable. Keep your body straight and pull your attached leg across the front of your body, keeping the leg straight. Slowly return to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets on each leg.'),
		(73, 'Side Lunges', 'Side lunges focus on lateral movement, engaging the adductor muscles, including the Adductor Brevis, as well as the glutes and quadriceps.',
			'Stand with your feet together. Take a large step to the side, bend your stepping leg while keeping the other leg straight, and lower your body by pushing your hips back. Make sure your bent knee does not extend past your toe. Push off your bent leg to return to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions on each side for 3 sets.'),
		(74, 'Toe and Foot Raises', 'This exercise targets the muscles responsible for lifting the foot and extending the toes, specifically engaging the Extensor Hallucis Longus.',
			'Stand or sit with your feet flat on the ground. Lift your toes off the ground while keeping your heels planted, then extend your big toe as much as possible. Hold the position for a few seconds before lowering your toes back to the ground. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(74, 'Resistance Band Toe Pulls', 'Using a resistance band adds tension to the toe extension exercises, enhancing the workout for the Extensor Hallucis Longus.',
			'Sit with your legs extended and loop a resistance band around your big toe. Hold the ends of the band with your hands to create tension. Extend your big toe by pulling it upward against the resistance of the band. Hold briefly, then slowly return the toe to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets on each foot.'),
		(75, 'Heel Walks', 'Heel walks help strengthen the muscles involved in dorsiflexion, including the Fibularis Tertius, while also promoting ankle stability.',
			'Stand upright and lift your toes off the ground, walking forward on your heels. Keep your toes pointed upward and outwards as you walk to emphasize eversion. Walk for 20-30 seconds for 3 sets.'),
		(75, 'Resistance Band Foot Eversions', 'This exercise uses a resistance band to specifically target and strengthen the eversion movement, engaging the Peroneus Brevis.',
			'Sit with your leg extended and a resistance band looped around the outside of your foot, anchored on the opposite side to create tension. Move your foot outward, away from the midline of your body, pulling against the resistance of the band. Hold briefly, then slowly return to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets on each foot.'),
		(75, 'Sidestepping with Band', 'Sidestepping with a band around the ankles or just above the knees can help strengthen the lateral lower leg muscles, including the Peroneus Brevis.',
			'Place a resistance band around your legs, either just above your ankles or knees. Get into a slight squat position. Step sideways over a small distance while keeping tension in the band, then step the other way. Make sure to keep your toes pointing forward, not outwards, to engage the correct muscles. Perform 10-15 steps in each direction for 3 sets.'),
		(76, 'Seated Calf Raises', 'Seated calf raises primarily target the soleus muscle but also involve the Plantaris due to their emphasis on plantar flexion from a bent-knee position, which minimizes the involvement of the gastrocnemius.',
			'Sit on a calf raise machine or a bench with a weighted pad across your thighs. Place the balls of your feet on a raised platform with your heels hanging off. Push up with your feet to raise your heels as high as possible, squeezing your calves at the top of the movement. Slowly lower your heels back down past the level of the platform to stretch your calves. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(76, 'Standing Calf Raises', 'While the gastrocnemius is more engaged in standing calf raises, the Plantaris also contributes to the movement, especially when performing the exercise with the knees slightly bent.',
			'Stand on a step or a raised platform with your heels hanging off the edge. You can do this using a calf raise machine or holding weights for added resistance. Rise up on your toes, contracting your calf muscles at the top, then lower your heels below the platform to stretch the calves maximally. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(76, 'Single-Legged Calf Raise', 'This variation increases the intensity of the exercise for each leg, promoting strength and balance, and further engaging the Plantaris muscle.',
			'Stand on one leg on a raised platform or step, with the other leg bent behind you. You can use a wall or a rail for balance. Rise up on your toe, squeezing the calf muscle tightly at the top, then lower your heel below the step to stretch. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets on each leg.'),
		(77, 'Front Dumbbell Raises', 'Front raises specifically target the anterior deltoids by lifting weights directly in front of you.',
			'Stand with your feet shoulder-width apart, holding a dumbbell in each hand in front of your thighs. With your elbows slightly bent, lift the weights straight up in front of you to shoulder height. Keep your body steady and avoid swinging the weights. Lower them slowly back to the starting position. Perform 10-12 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(77, 'Military Press', 'The military press is a compound exercise that targets the entire deltoid area but primarily focuses on the anterior and medial deltoids.',
			'Sit or stand with your back straight and lift a barbell to your shoulders, palms facing forward. Press the barbell upwards until your arms are fully extended overhead. Pause briefly at the top, then lower the bar back to the starting position. Perform 8-10 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(77, 'Arnold Press', 'Named after Arnold Schwarzenegger, this variation of the dumbbell press incorporates rotation, enhancing the engagement of the anterior deltoids.',
			'Start with a dumbbell in each hand at shoulder level, palms facing your shoulders. As you press the dumbbells overhead, rotate your hands so your palms face forward at the top of the movement. Reverse the motion as you bring the dumbbells back to the starting position. Perform 8-10 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(78, 'Lateral Raises', 'Lateral raises are a fundamental exercise that isolates the lateral deltoid, essential for building shoulder width and strength.',
			'Stand with your feet shoulder-width apart, holding a dumbbell in each hand at your sides. With a slight bend in your elbows, raise your arms out to the sides until they are level with your shoulders. Keep your torso stationary throughout the movement. Lower the dumbbells slowly back to the starting position. Perform 10-12 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(78, 'Uprigth Rows', 'Upright rows target the lateral deltoids as well as the traps and biceps, making it a compound movement for upper body development.',
			'Stand with your feet hip-width apart, holding a barbell or dumbbells in front of you with an overhand grip. Pull the weights straight up towards your chin, leading with your elbows and keeping the bar close to your body. Your elbows should be higher than your forearms at the top of the movement. Lower back down slowly. Perform 8-10 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(78, 'Cable Lateral Raises', 'Cable lateral raises provide constant tension on the lateral deltoids, enhancing muscle growth and strength.',
			' Stand next to a cable machine with the pulley set at the lowest position. Hold the cable handle with the hand farthest from the machine. With a slight bend in your elbow, raise your arm to the side until it is parallel with the floor. Slowly lower back down to the starting position. Perform 10-12 repetitions for 3 sets, then switch sides and repeat with the other arm.'),
		(79, 'Bent-Over Dumbbells Reverse Fly', 'This exercise isolates the posterior deltoids by moving the arms horizontally away from the midline of the body in a bent-over position.',
			'Stand with your feet shoulder-width apart, knees slightly bent. Bend forward at the waist until your torso is nearly parallel to the floor, holding a dumbbell in each hand with palms facing each other. With a slight bend in the elbows, lift the arms out to the sides until they are in line with the body. Squeeze your shoulder blades together at the top of the movement before slowly lowering the weights back to the starting position. Perform 10-12 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(79, 'Face Pulls', 'Face pulls target the posterior deltoids, upper back, and external rotators of the shoulders, enhancing shoulder health and posture.',
			'Attach a rope to a high pulley of a cable machine. Grasp the rope with both hands and step backward until your arms are extended in front of you. Pull the rope towards your face, separating your hands as you pull while keeping your upper arms parallel to the ground. Focus on squeezing your shoulder blades together. Slowly return to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(79, 'Standing Rear Delt Machine Fly', 'This machine exercise allows for focused work on the posterior deltoids with minimal involvement from other muscle groups.',
			'Sit or stand facing the rear delt fly machine with your chest against the pad. Grasp the handles with your arms outstretched. Pull the handles back using a reverse flying motion, keeping your arms slightly bent, until your hands are out to the sides. Slowly return to the starting position. Perform 10-12 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(80, 'Hanging Leg Raises', 'This exercise intensely targets the hip flexors, particularly the Psoas Major, by lifting the legs toward the torso while hanging from a bar.',
			'Hang from a pull-up bar with your legs straight down and your body stable. Raise your legs in front of you while keeping them straight until they are at least parallel to the ground, or higher if possible. Slowly lower your legs back to the starting position. Avoid swinging your legs or using momentum. Perform 8-12 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(80, 'Lying Leg Raises', 'Lying leg raises effectively isolate the hip flexors, especially the Psoas Major, in a controlled manner.',
			'Lie on your back on a flat surface with your legs straight and hands under your buttocks to support your lower back. Lift your legs straight up toward the ceiling until your buttocks slightly lift off the floor, then lower them slowly back to just above the floor without touching it. Keep your legs straight and movements controlled. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets.'),
		(80, 'Kneeling Hip Flexor Stretch', 'While primarily a stretch, this exercise helps to maintain the flexibility and health of the Psoas Major, preventing tightness and promoting better muscle function.',
			'Kneel on one knee, with the other foot in front, forming a 90-degree angle at both knees. Push your hips forward and down until you feel a stretch in the front of your hip on the kneeling side. Hold the stretch for 20-30 seconds, ensuring not to arch your lower back excessively. Switch legs and repeat. Perform this stretch 2-3 times on each side.'),
		(81, 'Seated Leg Lifts', 'This exercise targets the hip flexors, particularly the Iliacus, from a seated position, making it accessible and controlled.',
			'Sit on the edge of a sturdy chair or bench with your back straight. Keep one foot on the ground and lift the other leg straight out in front of you as high as possible without leaning backward. Hold the lifted position for a few seconds, then slowly lower your leg back to the starting position. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets on each leg.'),
		(81, 'Supine Hip Flexion', 'This exercise isolates the hip flexion movement, directly engaging the Iliacus in a supine (lying down) position.',
			'Lie on your back with your legs extended and arms at your sides. Lift one leg off the ground, keeping it as straight as possible, and bring it toward your chest. Lower it back down slowly and repeat the movement. Perform 10-15 repetitions for 3 sets on each leg.'),
		(81, 'Kneeling Hip Flexor Stretch', 'While primarily a stretching exercise, it is essential for maintaining the flexibility and health of the Iliacus, preventing tightness, and promoting better muscle function.',
			'Kneel on one knee, with the other foot in front, forming a 90-degree angle at both knees. Push your hips forward and down until you feel a stretch in the front of your hip on the kneeling side. Hold the stretch for 20-30 seconds, ensuring not to arch your lower back excessively. Switch legs and repeat. Perform this stretch 2-3 times on each side.');

/* Selects all from the exercises table */
SELECT * FROM exercises;


/* Creates a table for information about workouts */
CREATE TABLE workouts (
	WorkoutID INT IDENTITY(1,1) PRIMARY KEY,
	WorkoutName VARCHAR(255)
);

/* Inserts values into the table */
INSERT INTO workouts
VALUES	('Chest and Tricep'),
		('Leg Day (Front)'),
		('Back and Bicep'),
		('Leg Day (Back)'),
		('Shoulders');

/* Selects all from the workouts table */
SELECT * FROM workouts;


/* Creates a table for information about workouts, muscles and exercies */
CREATE TABLE WorkoutMuscles (
	WorkoutMusclesID INT IDENTITY(1,1) PRIMARY KEY,
    WorkoutID INT,
	ExerciseID INT,
    MuscleID INT,
    MuscleRole VARCHAR(50),
    FOREIGN KEY (WorkoutID) REFERENCES Workouts(WorkoutID),
    FOREIGN KEY (ExerciseID) REFERENCES exercises(ExerciseID),
    FOREIGN KEY (MuscleID) REFERENCES Muscles(MuscleID)
);

/* Inserts values into the table */
INSERT INTO WorkoutMuscles
VALUES	(3, 1, 1, 'Primary'),
		(3, 2, 1, 'Primary'),
		(3, 3, 1, 'Primary'),
		(3, 4, 2, 'Secondary'),
		(3, 5, 2, 'Secondary'),
		(1, 6, 3, 'Primary'),
		(1, 7, 3, 'Primary'),
		(1, 8, 3, 'Primary'),
		(3, 9, 4, 'Primary'),
		(3, 10, 4, 'Primary'),
		(3, 11, 4, 'Primary'),
		(1, 12, 5, 'Primary'),
		(1, 13, 5, 'Primary'),
		(4, 20, 8, 'Secondary'),
		(4, 21, 8, 'Secondary'),
		(2, 22, 9, 'Secondary'),
		(2, 23, 10, 'Primary'),
		(2, 24, 10, 'Primary'),
		(2, 25, 11, 'Primary'),
		(2, 26, 11, 'Primary'),
		(2, 27, 12, 'Primary'),
		(2, 28, 12, 'Primary'),
		(2, 29, 13, 'Primary'),
		(2, 30, 13, 'Primary'),
		(2, 31, 13, 'Primary'),
		(2, 32, 14, 'Primary'),
		(2, 33, 14, 'Primary'),
		(2, 34, 14, 'Primary'),
		(2, 35, 15, 'Primary'),
		(2, 36, 15, 'Primary'),
		(2, 37, 15, 'Primary'),
		(2, 38, 16, 'Primary'),
		(2, 39, 16, 'Primary'),
		(2, 40, 16, 'Primary'),
		(2, 41, 17, 'Secondary'),
		(2, 42, 17, 'Secondary'),
		(4, 43, 18, 'Secondary'),
		(4, 44, 18, 'Secondary'),
		(4, 45, 18, 'Secondary'),
		(2, 46, 19, 'Secondary'),
		(2, 47, 19, 'Secondary'),
		(4, 48, 20, 'Secondary'),
		(4, 49, 20, 'Secondary'),
		(2, 50, 21, 'Secondary'),
		(2, 51, 21, 'Secondary'),
		(3, 52, 22, 'Secondary'),
		(3, 53, 22, 'Secondary'),
		(3, 54, 22, 'Secondary'),
		(3, 55, 23, 'Secondary'),
		(3, 56, 23, 'Secondary'),
		(3, 57, 23, 'Secondary'),
		(3, 58, 24, 'Secondary'),
		(3, 59, 24, 'Secondary'),
		(3, 60, 25, 'Secondary'),
		(3, 61, 25, 'Secondary'),
		(3, 62, 25, 'Secondary'),
		(1, 63, 26, 'Secondary'),
		(1, 64, 26, 'Secondary'),
		(1, 65, 26, 'Secondary'),
		(1, 66, 27, 'Secondary'),
		(3, 68, 28, 'Primary'),
		(3, 69, 28, 'Primary'),
		(3, 70, 28, 'Primary'),
		(3, 71, 29, 'Primary'),
		(3, 72, 29, 'Primary'),
		(3, 73, 29, 'Primary'),
		(3, 74, 30, 'Primary'),
		(3, 75, 30, 'Primary'),
		(3, 76, 30, 'Primary'),
		(3, 77, 31, 'Primary'),
		(3, 78, 31, 'Primary'),
		(3, 79, 32, 'Primary'),
		(3, 80, 32, 'Primary'),
		(3, 81, 32, 'Primary'),
		(3, 82, 33, 'Secondary'),
		(3, 83, 33, 'Secondary'),
		(3, 84, 34, 'Secondary'),
		(3, 85, 34, 'Secondary'),
		(3, 86, 35, 'Primary'),
		(3, 87, 35, 'Primary'),
		(3, 88, 35, 'Primary'),
		(3, 89, 36, 'Primary'),
		(3, 90, 36, 'Primary'),
		(3, 91, 36, 'Primary'),
		(3, 92, 37, 'Primary'),
		(3, 93, 37, 'Primary'),
		(3, 94, 37, 'Primary'),
		(3, 95, 38, 'Secondary'),
		(3, 96, 38, 'Secondary'),
		(3, 97, 39, 'Secondary'),
		(3, 98, 39, 'Secondary'),
		(1, 99, 40, 'Secondary'),
		(1, 100, 40, 'Secondary'),
		(1, 101, 41, 'Secondary'),
		(1, 102, 41, 'Secondary'),
		(1, 103, 41, 'Secondary'),
		(1, 104, 42, 'Secondary'),
		(1, 105, 42, 'Secondary'),
		(1, 106, 43, 'Secondary'),
		(1, 107, 43, 'Secondary'),
		(5, 108, 44, 'Secondary'),
		(5, 109, 44, 'Secondary'),
		(5, 110, 45, 'Secondary'),
		(5, 111, 45, 'Secondary'),
		(5, 112, 46, 'Secondary'),
		(5, 113, 46, 'Secondary'),
		(5, 114, 47, 'Secondary'),
		(3, 115, 48, 'Secondary'),
		(3, 116, 48, 'Secondary'),
		(3, 117, 49, 'Secondary'),
		(3, 118, 49, 'Secondary'),
		(3, 119, 50, 'Secondary'),
		(3, 120, 50, 'Secondary'),
		(1, 121, 51, 'Secondary'),
		(1, 122, 51, 'Secondary'),
		(1, 123, 51, 'Secondary'),
		(5, 124, 52, 'Secondary'),
		(5, 125, 52, 'Secondary'),
		(5, 126, 53, 'Secondary'),
		(5, 127, 54, 'Secondary'),
		(5, 128, 55, 'Secondary'),
		(5, 129, 56, 'Secondary'),
		(5, 130, 57, 'Secondary'),
		(1, 131, 58, 'Primary'),
		(1, 132, 58, 'Primary'),
		(1, 133, 59, 'Primary'),
		(1, 134, 60, 'Primary'),
		(1, 135, 60, 'Primary'),
		(4, 136, 61, 'Primary'),
		(4, 137, 61, 'Primary'),
		(4, 138, 61, 'Primary'),
		(4, 139, 62, 'Primary'),
		(4, 140, 62, 'Primary'),
		(4, 141, 62, 'Primary'),
		(4, 142, 63, 'Primary'),
		(4, 143, 63, 'Primary'),
		(4, 144, 64, 'Secondary'),
		(4, 145, 64, 'Secondary'),
		(4, 146, 65, 'Secondary'),
		(4, 147, 65, 'Secondary'),
		(4, 148, 66, 'Secondary'),
		(4, 149, 66, 'Secondary'),
		(2, 150, 67, 'Secondary'),
		(2, 151, 67, 'Secondary'),
		(4, 152, 68, 'Primary'),
		(4, 153, 68, 'Primary'),
		(4, 154, 68, 'Primary'),
		(4, 155, 69, 'Primary'),
		(4, 156, 69, 'Primary'),
		(4, 157, 69, 'Primary'),
		(4, 158, 70, 'Primary'),
		(4, 159, 70, 'Primary'),
		(4, 160, 70, 'Primary'),
		(4, 161, 71, 'Secondary'),
		(4, 162, 71, 'Secondary'),
		(4, 163, 71, 'Secondary'),
		(4, 164, 72, 'Secondary'),
		(4, 165, 72, 'Secondary'),
		(4, 166, 73, 'Secondary'),
		(4, 167, 73, 'Secondary'),
		(4, 168, 74, 'Secondary'),
		(4, 169, 74, 'Secondary'),
		(4, 170, 75, 'Secondary'),
		(4, 171, 76, 'Secondary'),
		(4, 172, 76, 'Secondary'),
		(4, 173, 76, 'Secondary'),
		(5, 174, 77, 'Primary'),
		(5, 175, 77, 'Primary'),
		(5, 176, 77, 'Primary'),
		(5, 177, 78, 'Primary'),
		(5, 178, 78, 'Primary'),
		(5, 179, 78, 'Primary'),
		(5, 180, 79, 'Primary'),
		(5, 181, 79, 'Primary'),
		(5, 182, 79, 'Primary'),
		(4, 183, 80, 'Secondary'),
		(4, 184, 80, 'Secondary'),
		(4, 185, 80, 'Secondary'),
		(4, 186, 81, 'Secondary'),
		(4, 187, 81, 'Secondary'),
		(4, 188, 81, 'Secondary');

/* Selects all from the WorkoukMuscles table */
SELECT * FROM WorkoutMuscles


/* Lists the workout, muscle, exercise, how to do the exercise, what the primary function is for calf workouts */
SELECT w.WorkoutName, m.MuscleName, e.ExerciseName, e.Technique, m.PrimaryFunction, wm.MuscleRole
FROM WorkoutMuscles wm
JOIN muscles m on wm.MuscleID=m.MuscleID
JOIN workouts w on wm.WorkoutID=w.WorkoutID
JOIN exercises e on wm.ExerciseID=e.ExerciseID
WHERE m.MuscleGroup = 'Calf'
ORDER BY w.WorkoutName;

/* Lists all the exercises in the chest and tricep workout */
SELECT w.WorkoutName, e.ExerciseName, m.MuscleName, wm.MuscleRole
FROM Workouts w
JOIN WorkoutMuscles wm ON w.WorkoutID = wm.WorkoutID
JOIN Exercises e ON wm.ExerciseID = e.ExerciseID
JOIN Muscles m ON wm.MuscleID = m.MuscleID
WHERE w.WorkoutName = 'Chest and Tricep'
ORDER BY wm.MuscleRole;

/* This query lists each workout along with the primary muscles targeted */
SELECT w.WorkoutName, m.MuscleName
FROM Workouts w
JOIN WorkoutMuscles wm ON w.WorkoutID = wm.WorkoutID
JOIN Muscles m ON wm.MuscleID = m.MuscleID
WHERE wm.MuscleRole = 'Primary'
ORDER BY w.WorkoutName;

/* Counts how many exercises per workout */
SELECT w.WorkoutName, COUNT(e.ExerciseID) AS NumberOfExercises
FROM Workouts w
JOIN WorkoutMuscles wm ON w.WorkoutID = wm.WorkoutID
JOIN Exercises e ON wm.ExerciseID = e.ExerciseID
GROUP BY w.WorkoutName
ORDER BY NumberOfExercises DESC;

/* Lists detailed information about each exercise within a workout, including descriptions and techniques */
SELECT w.WorkoutName, e.ExerciseName, e.Description, e.Technique
FROM Workouts w
JOIN WorkoutMuscles wm ON w.WorkoutID = wm.WorkoutID
JOIN Exercises e ON wm.ExerciseID = e.ExerciseID
WHERE w.WorkoutName = 'Leg Day (Front)';

/* List all muscles used in each workout with the exercise and wether it is a primary or secondary exercise */
SELECT w.WorkoutName, m.MuscleName, e.ExerciseName, wm.MuscleRole
FROM Workouts w
JOIN WorkoutMuscles wm ON w.WorkoutID = wm.WorkoutID
JOIN Exercises e ON wm.ExerciseID = e.ExerciseID
JOIN Muscles m ON wm.MuscleID = m.MuscleID
ORDER BY w.WorkoutName, wm.MuscleRole;

/* Uses a CTE to select the first exercise from each workout*/ 
WITH RankedExercises AS (
    SELECT w.WorkoutName, e.ExerciseName, RANK() OVER (PARTITION BY w.WorkoutName ORDER BY e.ExerciseID) AS Rank
    FROM Workouts w
    JOIN WorkoutMuscles wm ON w.WorkoutID = wm.WorkoutID
    JOIN Exercises e ON wm.ExerciseID = e.ExerciseID
)
SELECT WorkoutName, ExerciseName
FROM RankedExercises
WHERE Rank = 1;
